Washington statutes.
RCW 4.88.330

Indigent party—State payment of review costs.

When a party has been judicially determined to have a constitutional right to obtain a review and to be unable by reason of poverty to procure counsel to perfect the review all costs necessarily incident to the proper consideration of the review including preparation of the record, reasonable fees for court appointed counsel to be determined by the supreme court, and actual travel expenses of counsel for appearance in the supreme court or court of appeals, shall be paid by the state. Upon satisfaction of requirements established by supreme court rules and submission of appropriate vouchers to the clerk of the supreme court, payment shall be made from funds specifically appropriated by the legislature for that purpose.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 261 s 2. Prior: 1972 ex.s. c 111 s 2; 1970 ex.s. c 31 s 2; 1965 c 133 s 2. Formerly RCW 10.01.112.]

NOTES:

Severability—1965 c 133: See note following RCW 2.32.240.

Transcript of testimony—Fee—Forma pauperis: RCW 2.32.240.